District of Columbia statutes.
3-1309

Record of proceedings.

The Board shall provide books in which shall be kept a true, faithful, and correct record of all of its proceedings, which books shall be open and available to the public.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
1981 Ed., § 2-2509.